Idaho, session 2025, S1113.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 20, Title 16, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 16-2013A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
16-2013A. POSTADOPTION CONTACT AGREEMENTS. (1) As used in this sec-
tion, "postadoption contact agreement" means a document agreed to prior to
the finalization of an adoption of a child that outlines the relationship be-
tween an adoptive parent, a birth parent, and an adopted child after the fi-
nalization of adoption.
(2) In order for a postadoption contact agreement to be enforceable,
all parties shall be given the opportunity to consult with and be represented
by a licensed attorney prior to signing the postadoption contact agreement.
Additionally, a postadoption contact agreement shall be:
(a) Approved by the court before or as part of the finalization of the
adoption; and
(b) Signed by each party claiming a right or obligation in the agree-
ment.
(3) A postadoption contact agreement shall describe the information,
if any, that shall be provided to the birth parent about the adopted child,
the information, if any, that shall be provided to the child about the birth
parent as the child grows, how often that information shall be provided, and
the method of delivery of such information.
(4) A postadoption contact agreement shall be filed with the court upon
finalization of adoption.
(5) A postadoption contact agreement may not limit the adoptive par-
ent's ability to move out of state.
(6) A postadoption contact agreement may be modified with the written
consent of the adoptive parent and birth parent, or by order of the court if
the court finds that modification of the agreement is in the best interest of
the child.
(7) A postadoption contact agreement that has been found not to be in
the best interest of the adopted child shall not be enforced.
(8) A violation of a postadoption contact agreement is not grounds:
(a) To set aside an adoption; or
(b) For an award of monetary damages.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean that a postadop-
tion contact agreement is required before an adoption may be finalized.


(10) Refusal or failure to agree to a postadoption contact agreement is
not admissible in any adoption proceeding.
(11) The court that approves a postadoption contact agreement retains
jurisdiction over any modification, termination, and enforcement of any ap-
proved postadoption contact agreement.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.